Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-614
Cabin trailer, defined.

Cabin trailer shall mean a trailer or semitrailer which is designed, constructed, and equipped as a dwelling place, living abode, or sleeping place, whether used for such purposes or instead permanently or temporarily for the advertising, sale, display, or promotion of merchandise or services or for any other commercial purpose except transportation of property for hire or transportation of property for distribution by a private carrier. Cabin trailer shall not mean a trailer or semitrailer which is permanently attached to real estate. There shall be three classes of cabin trailers:

(1) Camping trailer which shall include cabin trailers one hundred two inches or less in width and forty feet or less in length and adjusted mechanically smaller for towing;

(2) Mobile home which shall include cabin trailers more than one hundred two inches in width or more than forty feet in length; and

(3) Travel trailer which shall include cabin trailers not more than one hundred two inches in width nor more than forty feet in length from front hitch to rear bumper, except as provided in subdivision (2)(k) of section 60-6,288.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 110;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 4;

Laws 2001, LB 376, § 2.

A manufactured home is a class of cabin trailer for purposes of this section. Green Tree Fin. Servicing v. Sutton, 264 Neb. 533, 650 N.W.2d 228 (2002).